Utah statutes.
13-41-201.   Excessive price prohibited.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), if a state of emergency exists, a
person may not charge a consumer an excessive price for goods or services sold
or provided at retail:
(a) (i)  during the time period for which a state of emergency declared by the
governor exists; or
(ii)  for 30 days after the day on which the state of emergency begins, if
declared by the President of the United States; and
(b)  within the emergency territory.
(2)  A person may charge an excessive price if:
(a)  that person's cost of obtaining the good or providing the service exceeds
the average cost to the person of obtaining the good or providing the service
in the 30-day period immediately preceding the day on which the state of
emergency is declared; and
(b)  the price charged for the good or service does not exceed the sum of:
(i)  10% above the total cost to that person of obtaining the good or
providing the service; and
(ii)  the person's customary markup.
(3)  Upon request of the division, a person allegedly charging an excessive
price under Subsection (2) shall provide documentation to the division that
the person is in compliance with this chapter.
(4)  If a good or service has not been sold by a person during the 30-day
period immediately preceding the day on which the state of emergency is
declared, a price is not excessive if it does not exceed 30% above the
person's total cost of obtaining the good or providing the service.
